Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1778
Maximum share account.

A credit union may, by action of the board of directors, establish a maximum amount that a member may have in any given type of share account. Any such action shall not affect any contract entered into by the credit union prior to the time of such action.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 78.